District of Columbia statutes.
37-131.04

Assignment of vending locations.

(a)

A vendor shall not vend from a vending location without first obtaining a vending site permit from the Mayor.

(b)

Vending locations shall be assigned by lotteries conducted by the Mayor, unless:

(1)

The Mayor establishes an alternate means of assignment by rule;

(2)

The vending location is located in a vending development zone, in which case the vending location may be assigned by lottery or such other means as may be established for the vending development zone; or

(3)

(A)

The vending location was permitted pursuant to the District of Columbia Department of Transportation and Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs Vending Consolidation of Public Space and Licensing Authorities Temporary Act of 2006, effective March 8, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-252; 54 DCR 631), and was assigned to an existing, licensed vendor.

(B)

A vending location identified in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall remain assigned to the existing, licensed vendor; provided, that the vendor’s license status remains in effect and in good standing.

(c)

Vendors who are licensed as of October 22, 2009, and had been, at any time, assigned a vending location pursuant to section 6(c-1)(3) of the Vending Regulation Temporary Act of 2008, effective June 5, 2008 (D.C. Law 17-172; 55 DCR 5377), shall be given a preference in lotteries conducted by the Mayor for assigning those vending locations. The lotteries shall be conducted monthly or on an alternative schedule as determined by the Mayor.

(d)

Notwithstanding any provision of this section, a vending site permit shall constitute a revocable license and a vendor shall not acquire a property interest in the vending site permit.

Oct. 22, 2009, D.C. Law 18-71, § 5, 56 DCR 6619
Section 2(c) of D.C. Law 19-144 added subsec. (b-1) to read as follows:
“(b-1) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, the Mayor may issue up to 15 vending site permits to healthy food vendors located in underserved areas; provided, that if a vendor receiving a vending site permit ceases to be a healthy food vendor, the Mayor shall revoke the permit.”.
Section 5(b) of D.C. Law 19-144 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 10(a) of Vending Regulation Emergency Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-322, March 19, 2008, 55 DCR 3445).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 10(a) of Vending Regulation Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-9, January 29, 2009, 56 DCR 1638).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 10(a) of Vending Regulation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-47, April 27, 2009, 56 DCR 3574).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(c) of Fresh Healthy Mobile Cart Vending Pilot in Underserved Areas Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-325, March 18, 2012, 59 DCR 2261).